src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IND-PRT2-35
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.35@+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.35@%>%{оеэØ%}лидизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.35@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.35@%>%{оеэØ%}лидезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-36
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.36@+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.36@%>%{оеэØ%}линзе VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.36@+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.36@%>%{оеэØ%}линде VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.36@+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.36@%>%{оеэØ%}линдзе VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-40
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.40@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>%{оеэØ%}линек VerbEnd_K-lak ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.40@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>%{оеэØ%}линик VerbEnd_K-lak ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-42
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.42@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.42@%>%{оеэØ%}лидизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.42@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.42@%>%{оеэØ%}лидезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-43
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.43@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.43@%>%{оеэØ%}линек VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.43@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.43@%>%{оеэØ%}линик VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-45
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.45@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.45@%>%{оеэØ%}лидизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.45@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.45@%>%{оеэØ%}лидезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-46
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.46@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.46@%>%{оеэØ%}линек VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.46@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.46@%>%{оеэØ%}линик VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-50
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.50@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.50@%>%{оеэØ%}лиде VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-51
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.51@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.51@%>%{оеэØ%}лимизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.51@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.51@%>%{оеэØ%}лимезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-53
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.53@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.53@%>%{оеэØ%}линк VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-54
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>%{оеэØ%}лимизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>%{оеэØ%}лимезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-56
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.56@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.56@%>%{оеэØ%}линк VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-60
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.30@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.30@%>%{оеэØ%}льть VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-61
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%>%{оеэØ%}лимизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%>%{оеэØ%}лимезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-62
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.62@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.62@%>%{оеэØ%}лидизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.62@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.62@%>%{оеэØ%}лидезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-63
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.63@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.63@%>%{оеэØ%}лизь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-64
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}лимизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}лимезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-65
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>%{оеэØ%}лидизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>%{оеэØ%}лидезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND-PRT2-66
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{оеэØ%}лизь VerbEnd_K ;



!! ## DESIDERATIVE 


LEXICON Desiderative-kadoms
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@%> Desiderative-noArrow ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@%>%{оеэØ%}ксы  DesPrt2-noArrow-Sc ;

LEXICON Desiderative-kundams
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@%> Desiderative-noArrow ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@%>ксы  DesPrt2-noArrow-Sc ;

LEXICON Desiderative-noArrow
:%{иы%}ксэ DesPrt2-noArrow ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Der/Dimin:%{иы%}кске DesPrt2-noArrow ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:%{иы%}ксы DesPrt2-noArrow ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.13@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.16@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.23@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.26@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.33@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.36@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.43@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.46@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.53@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.56@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.63@ Desiderative1_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.66@ Desiderative1_Obj ;

LEXICON Desiderative1_Obj
@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-PX.33@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-PX.33@%{иы%}ксэльсе VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-PX.33@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-PX.33@%{иы%}кскельсе VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-PX.33@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-PX.33@%{иы%}ксыльсе VerbEnd_K ;




!LEXICON DesiderativePrt2_noArrow
!:%{иы%} DesPrt2-noArrow ;

LEXICON DesPrt2-noArrow
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.13@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.16@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.23@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.26@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.33@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.36@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.43@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.46@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.53@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.56@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.63@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.66@ DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows ;
 DesPrt2-noArrow-Sc ;

LEXICON DesPrt2-noArrow-Sc
 DES-PRT2-10 ;
 DES-PRT2-20 ;
 DES-PRT2-30 ;
 DES-PRT2-40 ;
 DES-PRT2-50 ;
 DES-PRT2-60 ;

LEXICON DesPrt2_Obj_noArrows
 DES-PRT2-12 ;
 DES-PRT2-13 ;
 DES-PRT2-15 ;
 DES-PRT2-16 ;
 DES-PRT2-21 ;
 DES-PRT2-23 ;
 DES-PRT2-24 ;
 DES-PRT2-26 ;
 DES-PRT2-31 ;
 DES-PRT2-32 ;
 DES-PRT2-33 ;
 DES-PRT2-34 ;
 DES-PRT2-35 ;
 DES-PRT2-36 ;
 DES-PRT2-42 ;
 DES-PRT2-43 ;
 DES-PRT2-45 ;
 DES-PRT2-46 ;
 DES-PRT2-51 ;
 DES-PRT2-53 ;
 DES-PRT2-54 ;
 DES-PRT2-56 ;
 DES-PRT2-61 ;
 DES-PRT2-62 ;
 DES-PRT2-63 ;
 DES-PRT2-64 ;
 DES-PRT2-65 ;
 DES-PRT2-66 ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-10
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.10@+Des+Prt2+ScSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.10@линь  VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.10@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.10@лень  VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-12
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.12@+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.12@литинь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.12@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.12@литень VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-13
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.13@+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.13@лия VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.13@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.13@лие VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.13@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.13@лиять VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-15
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.15@+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.15@лидизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.15@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.15@лидезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-16
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.16@+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.16@линь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.16@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.16@лень VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-20
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.20@+Des+Prt2+ScSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.20@лить VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.20@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.20@леть VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-21
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.21@+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.21@лимик VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.21@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.21@лимек VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-23
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.23@+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.23@лик VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.23@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.23@лек VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-24
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.24@лимизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.24@лимезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-26
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.26@+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.26@лить VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.26@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.26@ли VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-30
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.30@+Des+Prt2+ScSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.30@ль VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON DES-PRT2-31
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.31@+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.31@лимим VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.31@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.DES@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.31@лимем VerbEnd_K ;
